Nebraska, session 109, LB1150.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1150 LB1150
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-6827, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6827 (1) In order to utilize the incentives allowed in the
ImagiNE Nebraska Act, the taxpayer shall file an application with the
director, on a form developed by the director, requesting an agreement.
(2) The application shall:
(a) Identify the taxpayer applying for incentives;
(b) Identify all locations sought to be within the agreement and the
reason each such location constitutes or is expected to constitute a
qualified location;
(c) State the estimated, projected amount of new investment and the
estimated, projected number of new employees;
(d) Identify the required levels of employment and investment for
the various incentives listed within section 77-6831 that will govern the
agreement. The taxpayer may identify different levels of employment and
investment until the first December 31 following the end of the ramp-up
period on a form approved by the director. The identified levels of
employment and investment will govern all years covered under the
agreement;
(e) Identify whether the agreement is for a single qualified
location, all qualified locations within a county, all qualified
locations in more than one county, or all qualified locations within the
state;
(f) Acknowledge that the taxpayer understands the requirements for
offering health coverage, and for reporting the value of such coverage,
as specified in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act;
(g) Acknowledge that the taxpayer does not violate any state or
federal law against discrimination;
(h) Acknowledge that the taxpayer understands the requirements for
providing a sufficient package of benefits to its employees as specified
in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act; and
-2-

LB1150 LB1150
2026 2026
(i) Identify any contracts entered into between the taxpayer and the
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement; and
(j) (i) Contain a nonrefundable application fee of five thousand
dollars. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Nebraska Incentives Fund.
(3) An application must be complete to establish the date of the
application. An application shall be considered complete once it contains
the items listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, if
the director is (4) Once satisfied that the application is consistent
with the purposes stated in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act for one or more
qualified locations within this state, the director shall approve the
application, subject to the base authority limitations provided in
section 77-6839.
(b) The director shall not approve an application for a taxpayer
that has entered into a contract with the United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement.
(5) The director shall make his or her determination to approve or
not approve an application within ninety days after the date of the
application. If the director requests, by mail or by electronic means,
additional information or clarification from the taxpayer in order to
make his or her determination, such ninety-day period shall be tolled
from the time the director makes the request to the time he or she
receives the requested information or clarification from the taxpayer.
The taxpayer and the director may also agree to extend the ninety-day
period. If the director fails to make his or her determination within the
prescribed ninety-day period, the application is deemed approved, subject
to the base authority limitations provided in section 77-6839.
(6) There shall be no new applications for incentives filed under
this section after December 31, 2030. All complete applications filed on
or before December 31, 2030, shall be considered by the director and
-3-

LB1150 LB1150
2026 2026
approved if the location or locations and taxpayer qualify for benefits,
subject to the base authority limitations provided in section 77-6839.
Agreements may be executed with regard to complete applications filed on
or before December 31, 2030. All agreements pending, approved, or entered
into before such date shall continue in full force and effect.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-6827, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-